Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-679
Health care data analysis section; public-sector health care programs; requirements.

Data and research initiatives by the health care data analysis section of the Department of Health and Human Services related to public-sector health care programs shall:

(1) Assist the state's current health care financing and delivery programs to deliver and purchase health care in a manner that promotes improvements in health care efficiency and effectiveness;

(2) Assist the state in its public health activities, including the analysis of disease prevalence and trends and the development of public health responses;

(3) Assist the state in developing and refining its overall health policy, including policy related to health care costs, quality, and access; and

(4) Provide health care information that allows the evaluation of state health care financing and delivery programs.

Laws 1994, LB 1223, § 125;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 858;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 748.